Arkansas, session 2025, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Supreme Court recognized in Gunn v. Farmers Ins. Exch.,
2010 Ark. 434 (2010) and Stockton v. Sentry Ins., 337 Ark. 507 (1999), that:
(A) The Arkansas Franchise Practices Act does not apply to
the relationship between an insurance company and the insurance company's
agents; and
(B) A franchise relationship does not exist between an
insurance company and the insurance company's agent under the Arkansas
Franchise Practices Act;
(2) The Supreme Court correctly decided that the Arkansas
Franchise Practices Act does not apply to an insurance agent who solicits or
sells insurance on behalf of an insurance company;
(3) The Supreme Court properly and correctly interpreted and
applied the Arkansas Franchise Practices Act; and
*ANS100*
01/21/2025 11:16:21 AM ANS100

HB1177
(4) Existing case law should not be altered or extended.
(b) The General Assembly intends for Sections 2 and 3 of this act to
codify the rulings by the Supreme Court in Gunn v. Farmers Ins. Exch., 2010
Ark. 434 (2010) and Stockton v. Sentry Ins., 337 Ark. 507 (1999), that the
Arkansas Franchise Practices Act does not apply to business relations,
actions, or transactions between an insurance company and an insurance agent
who solicits or sells insurance on behalf of the insurance company.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-72-202(1), concerning the definition of
"franchise" used under the Arkansas Franchise Practices Act, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) "Franchise" does not include business relations,
actions, or transactions between an insurance company and an insurance agent
who solicits or sells insurance on behalf of the insurance company;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-72-203, concerning the applicability of
the Arkansas Franchise Practices Act, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d) This subchapter does not apply to business relations, actions, or
transactions between an insurance company and an insurance agent who solicits
or sells insurance on behalf of the insurance company.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity.
(a) Section 2 of this act applies retroactively to the effective date
of Acts 1991, No. 411.
(b) Section 3 of this act applies retroactively to the effective date
of Acts 1991, No. 760.









01/21/2025 11:16:21 AM ANS100